Utah statutes.
53B-8a-110.   Effect of payments on determination of need and eligibility
for student aid.
No student loan program, student grant program, or other program administered
by any agency of the state, except as may be otherwise provided by federal law
or the provisions of any specific grant applicable to that law, shall take
into account and consider amounts available for the payment of higher
education costs pursuant to the Utah Educational Savings Plan Trust in
determining need and eligibility for student aid.
